Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 4
COMMISSION ON INTERSTATE COOPERATION

2-3-401 to 2-3-406. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire part repealed, p. 259, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 4 was numbered as article 1 of chapter 74, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this part 4 prior to its repeal in 1977, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.